Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 17

Warehousing of Grain

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

[Reserved.]

Subchapter 2

— Public Warehouses — Generally

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1979, No. 83, § 42, provided that anticipatory action to implement the provisions of this subchapter could be taken prior to the effective date of this subchapter.

Effective Dates. Acts 1979, No. 83, § 43: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an urgent need for regulation and licensing of grain warehouses in the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, welfare and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1983, No. 264, § 3 [4]: Feb. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that grain producers routinely deliver their grain to warehouses and do not obtain warehouse receipts but merely unpriced scale tickets; that unpriced scale tickets should be nonnegotiable warehouse receipts and thereby provide the producer a secured position; and that this act is immediately necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 783, § 13: Mar. 29, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to continue the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the State Plant Board. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

2-17-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Public Grain Warehouse Law”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1301.

2-17-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner, who shall be the Director of the State Plant Board or his or her designated representative;

“Grain” means all grains for which standards have been established under the United States Grain Standards Act, as amended, and shall include rice, as defined by the standards of the United States Department of Agriculture;

“Person” means individuals, corporations, partnerships, and all associations of two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest;

“Public grain warehouse” means any building, structure, or other protected enclosure in this state used for the purpose of storing grain for a consideration;

“Public grain warehouseman” means any person who operates a public grain warehouse as defined in this section;

“Stored grain” means any grain received in any public grain warehouse, located in this state, if it is not purchased and beneficially owned by the public grain warehouseman; and

“Warehouse receipt” means a licensed warehouse receipt issued under this subchapter and an unpriced scale ticket.

Including unpriced scale tickets within the definition of “warehouse receipt” does not make the unpriced scale tickets negotiable.

U.S. Code. The United States Grain Standards Act referred to in this section is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 71 et seq.

Cited: Tucker v. Durham, 285 Ark. 264, 686 S.W.2d 402 (1985); Cooper, Inc. v. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co., 289 Ark. 218, 711 S.W.2d 155 (1986); Reynolds v. Commodity Credit Corp., 300 Ark. 441, 780 S.W.2d 15 (1989).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 2; 1983, No. 264, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1302.

2-17-203. Applicability.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to all public grain warehouses and to the operations of public grain warehouses whether or not any of the grain therein is owned by the warehouseman, unless the public grain warehouse is licensed under the provisions of the United States Warehouse Act, as amended.

The provisions and definitions of the Uniform Commercial Code, § 4-1-101 et seq., relating to warehouse receipts, to the extent not inconsistent with this subchapter, shall govern warehouse receipts issued by public grain warehousemen, and the other provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, § 4-1-101 et seq. shall also be applicable to the provisions of this subchapter to the extent not inconsistent with this subchapter.

U.S. Code. The United States Warehouse Act referred to in this section is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 241 et seq.

Cited: Tucker v. Durham, 285 Ark. 264, 686 S.W.2d 402 (1985); Reynolds v. Commodity Credit Corp., 300 Ark. 441, 780 S.W.2d 15 (1989).

Cross References. Imposition of fines, §5-4-201.

Sentence of imprisonment, §5-4-401.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1303.

2-17-204. Penalties.

Any person who issues a warehouse receipt for grain without holding a valid public grain warehouse license or who commits any willful violation of any provision of this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any unintentional or negligent violation of this subchapter shall be a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 37; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1337.

2-17-205. Duty to enforce.

The State Plant Board shall carry out and enforce the provisions of this subchapter and is empowered to:

Promulgate rules;

Carry out necessary inspections;

Appoint and fix the duties of personnel; and

Provide such equipment as may be necessary to enforce the provisions hereof.

Cited: Banque Indosuez v. King, 46 Ark. App. 270, 878 S.W.2d 432 (1994).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1304.

2-17-206. State license.

No person shall operate a public grain warehouse or issue a warehouse receipt without first having obtained a license under this subchapter, unless the public grain warehouse is licensed under the provisions of the United States Warehouse Act, as amended.

All public grain warehouses licensed under the United States Warehouse Act, as amended, shall file with the State Plant Board copies of their current licenses and copies of all subsequent licenses or renewals so as to always have copies of current licenses on file with the board.

U.S. Code. The United States Warehouse Act referred to in this section is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 241 et seq.

Licenses issued under this subchapter are not transferable. Any person acquiring a new or existing public grain warehouse must apply for a license to operate the warehouse, subject to other provisions of this subchapter.

The Commodity Credit Corporation, an agency of the federal government, is a protected depositor of grain under the Arkansas Public Grain Warehouse Law, and is entitled to share in the pro-rata disbursement of a warehouseman's bond. Reynolds v. Commodity Credit Corp., 300 Ark. 441, 780 S.W.2d 15 (1989).

A bond issued to a grain warehouseman covers only those who hold warehouse receipts for grain stored; it does not cover a farmer who sells his or her grain to warehouseman but does not receive the promised payment. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Wright, 285 Ark. 228, 686 S.W.2d 778 (1985).

A bond issued by a surety to a public grain warehouseman was intended only for the protection of holders of “warehouse receipts”; therefore, since the farmers admittedly held only unpriced scale tickets and not warehouse receipts, there could be no recovery under the bond and, hence, no cause of action against the surety. Cooper, Inc. v. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co., 289 Ark. 218, 711 S.W.2d 155 (1986) (decision prior to 1983 amendment of §2-17-202, which included unpriced scale ticket in definition of warehouse receipt).

The commissioner may make exceptions to the bonding requirements of this section for good cause shown upon a finding that the requirements would substantially impair the warehouseman's ability to continue operations as a public grain warehouse and that the exception will not materially affect the protection of storage receipt holders under this subchapter.

The exceptions must be reviewed at least annually.

A bond issued to a grain warehouseman covers only those who hold warehouse receipts for grain stored; it does not cover a farmer who sells his or her grain to warehouseman but does not receive the promised payment. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Wright, 285 Ark. 228, 686 S.W.2d 778 (1985).

A hearing shall be held within ninety (90) days of the request.

If after the hearing the commissioner denies the applicant a license, the commissioner shall transmit immediately to the applicant by certified mail an order so providing which shall state the reasons for the denial.

In the event the applicant is dissatisfied with the decision of the commissioner after the hearing, the applicant may institute proceedings for judicial review in the circuit court of the county where the public grain warehouse is located or in the Pulaski County Circuit Court within thirty (30) days after service upon the applicant of the commissioner's final order, under § 25-15-212.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1305.

2-17-207. License applications.

(1)Applications for licenses under this subchapter are to be made on forms prescribed by the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner for each warehouse.

Every application is to be accompanied by an application fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and a certified financial statement in a form prescribed by the commissioner and any further information the commissioner may by rule require.

(1)If a warehouseman operates one (1) or more warehouses in the same city or town in conjunction with each other, if only one (1) set of books is kept for all the warehouses and scale tickets, and if warehouse receipts and checks of but one (1) series are issued for grain received or stored therein, then only one (1) license and bond shall be required for the operation of all the warehouses. In these cases, the license fee prescribed in this section shall be computed on the basis of the aggregate capacity of all warehouses operated by the licensee.

The use for the storage of grain by a licensed warehouseman of a facility which is in the same city or town as licensed facilities and is neither licensed nor exempted, or for other violation of the provisions of this section, shall be cause for suspension or revocation of any license issued to the warehouseman for the storage of grain.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1306.

2-17-208. Filing schedule of charges.

(1)Before the issuance of a license under this subchapter, the public grain warehouseman shall file a copy of his or her schedule of charges for storage and other services with the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner.

If the public grain warehouseman desires to make any changes in the schedule of charges during the license period, he or she shall file with the commissioner a statement in writing showing the change at least thirty (30) days before its effective date.

Each public grain warehouseman shall keep conspicuously posted the schedule of charges for storage and other services as so filed and shall strictly adhere to these charges.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1308.

2-17-209. Bond requirements.

(1)(A)(i)Before any license is issued to any warehouseman, the warehouseman shall file with the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner a surety bond executed by the public grain warehouseman as principal and by a corporate surety licensed to do business in this state as surety.

The bond shall run to the State of Arkansas and be for the benefit of all depositors or storers of grain, their legal representatives, attorneys, or assigns.

(i)No bond shall be accepted for the purposes of this subchapter until it has been approved by the commissioner.

The bond shall be conditioned upon the warehouseman delivering all stored grain or payment of the value thereof upon the surrender of the warehouse receipt.

The commissioner may require the increases in the amount of the bond, from time to time, as he or she may deem necessary for the protection of the storage receipt holders.

(A)The aggregate liability of the surety to all depositors or storers of grain shall not exceed the sum of the bond.

The bond may be cancelled at any time by the surety by giving written notice to the commissioner of its intention to cancel the bond. All liability thereunder shall terminate thirty (30) days after the receipt of the notice by the commissioner, except that the notice shall not affect any claims arising under the bond, whether presented or not, before the effective date of the cancellation notice.

In lieu of the bond required in subsection (a) of this section, an applicant for a license may be a self-insurer by posting with the commissioner cash or any combination of securities, the market value of which is readily ascertainable and, if negotiable, by delivery or assignment, of the kinds described in §23-63-806, United States Government obligations, §23-63-809, municipal or county utilities, §23-63-813, international banks, and §23-63-814, corporate bonds and debentures.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1315.

2-17-210. Amount of bond.

(1)The amount of bond to be furnished for each public grain warehouse shall be fixed at a rate of:

Twenty cents (20¢) per bushel for the first one million (1,000,000) bushels of licensed capacity;

Fifteen cents (15¢) per bushel for the next one million (1,000,000) bushels of licensed capacity; and

Ten cents (10¢) per bushel for all licensed capacity over two million (2,000,000) bushels.

In no case shall the amount of the bond be less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), except as prescribed in subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

The licensed capacity shall be equal to the maximum number of bushels of grain that the public grain warehouse can accommodate for storage.

(1)(A)A public grain warehouseman who is licensed or is applying for licenses to operate two (2) or more public grain warehouses may furnish a single bond. This bond shall meet the requirements of this subchapter to cover all public grain warehouses within the state.

In these cases, all public grain warehouses to be covered by the bond shall be deemed to be one (1) warehouse for purposes of determining the amount of bond required under subsection (a) of this section.

The aggregate licensed capacity of all the warehouses shall be used in determining the amount of the bond.

(1)Any deficiency in the net assets required by §2-17-217 shall be supplied by an increase in the amount of the warehouseman's bond.

In any other case in which the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner finds that conditions exist which warrant requiring additional bond, there shall be added to the amount of the bond such further amount as determined to be reasonable by the commissioner.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1316.

2-17-211. Issuance or denial of license.

Upon satisfaction of the requirements of this subchapter and any applicable rules by an applicant, the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner shall issue a license to operate a public grain warehouse.

(1)If after proper application the commissioner denies any person a license to operate a public grain warehouse, the commissioner shall transmit immediately to the applicant, by certified mail, an order so providing, which shall state the reasons for the denial.

(A)In the event the applicant is dissatisfied with the decision of the commissioner, the applicant may request a hearing with the commissioner to appear and defend its compliance with all appropriate rules or give evidence that all deficiencies have been corrected.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1310.

2-17-212. Posting of license.

Immediately upon receipt of his or her license or of any modification or extension thereof, the public grain warehouseman shall post it and thereafter keep it posted, until suspended or terminated, in a conspicuous place in the office of the public grain warehouse to which the license applies where receipts issued by the public grain warehouseman are delivered to depositors.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1311.

2-17-213. Annual license fee.

Subsequent to the issuance of an initial license under this subchapter, every applicant shall pay an annual license fee based upon the capacity of the warehouse. The fee shall be determined by the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner but shall be no less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than eight hundred dollars ($800).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1307; Acts 1993, No. 783, § 3.

2-17-214. Renewal of license.

If a public grain warehouseman desires to renew his or her license for an additional year, application for the renewal shall be made on a form prescribed by the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner.

At least sixty (60) days before the expiration of each license, the commissioner shall notify each public grain warehouseman of the date of the expiration and furnish the public grain warehouseman with the renewal form.

In case a license issued to a public grain warehouseman expires or is suspended, revoked, or cancelled by the commissioner or his or her designated representative, the license shall be immediately returned to the commissioner, and the public grain warehouseman shall forthwith comply with the provisions of § 2-17-237.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1312.

2-17-215. Suspension, cancellation, or revocation of licenses.

If a public grain warehouseman is convicted of any crime involving fraud or deceit or if the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner determines that any public grain warehouseman has violated any of the provisions of this subchapter or any of the rules adopted by the commissioner under this subchapter, the commissioner may suspend, cancel, or revoke the license of the public grain warehouseman.

(1)All proceedings for the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of licenses shall be before the commissioner. The proceedings shall be in accordance with rules which shall be adopted by the commissioner.

(A)No suspension, cancellation, or revocation of any license is lawful unless, before the institution of the proceedings, the commissioner has given notice by mail to the licensee of facts or conduct warranting the intended action and the licensee has been given an opportunity to show compliance with all lawful requirements for the retention of the license.

If the commissioner finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, summary suspension of a license may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action, which proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined.

(i)Whenever the commissioner shall suspend, cancel, or revoke any license, he or she shall prepare an order so providing which shall state the reason or reasons for the suspension, cancellation, or revocation.

The order shall be sent by certified mail by the commissioner to the licensee at the address of the public grain warehouse licensed.

Within thirty (30) days after service upon the licensee of the order, the licensee, if dissatisfied with the order of the commissioner, may institute proceedings for judicial review in the circuit court of the county where the public grain warehouse is located or in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1313.

2-17-216. Replacement of license.

Upon satisfactory proof of the loss or destruction of a license issued to a public grain warehouseman, a duplicate or a new license may be issued under the same number.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1314.

2-17-217. Net assets required.

Above all exemptions and liabilities, each public grain warehouseman shall have and maintain total net assets available for the payment of any indebtedness arising from the conduct of the public grain warehouse in an amount equal to at least ten cents (10¢) multiplied by the maximum number of bushels of grain for which the public grain warehouse is licensed.

No person may be licensed as a public grain warehouseman unless he or she has available net assets of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Any deficiency in net assets required above the minimum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) may, at the discretion of the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner, be supplied by a commensurate increase in the amount of the public grain warehouseman's bond.

In determining total available net assets, credit may be given for insurable assets such as buildings, machinery, equipment, and merchandise inventory only to the extent of the current market value of the assets and only to the extent that the assets are protected by insurance against loss or damage.

The insurance shall be in the form of lawful policies issued by one (1) or more insurance companies authorized to do business and subject to service of process in suits brought in this state, and which provide that no cancellation shall be effective unless thirty (30) days' advance notice of the cancellation is given to the commissioner.

If a public grain warehouseman is licensed or is applying for license to operate two (2) or more public grain warehouses, the maximum total number of bushels which all the facilities will accommodate when stored in the manner customary to the warehouses, as determined by the commissioner, shall be considered in determining whether the public grain warehouseman meets the available net assets requirement of subsection (a) of this section.

For the purposes of this section only, capital stock as such shall not be considered a liability.

A statement that the holder of the receipt or the depositor of the grain shall demand the delivery of the grain on or before a date not later than one (1) year from the date specified by the public grain warehouseman;

The net weight, number of bushels, and the percentage of dockage;

The words “NOT NEGOTIABLE”, or “NEGOTIABLE”, according to the nature of the receipt, clearly and conspicuously printed or stamped thereon; and

That the holder of the receipt or the depositor of the grain shall demand the delivery of the grain not later than the expiration of one (1) year from the date of the receipt.

Demand for issuance of a new receipt;

Surrender of the old receipt by the lawful holder at or before the expiration of the period specified therein; and

An offer to satisfy the warehouseman's lien.

Every negotiable receipt issued shall, in addition to conforming with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, embody within its written or printed terms a form of endorsement which may be used by the depositor or his or her authorized agent for showing the ownership of, and liens, mortgages, or other encumbrances on, the grain covered by the receipt.

A public grain warehouseman shall not insert any language in any warehouse receipt or make any contract with respect to any warehouse receipt which purports to limit the liabilities or responsibilities imposed on him or her by law.

Warehouse receipts being negotiable instruments, their transfer carried the title to the cotton represented by them, subject to outstanding superior title. Sewell v. Federal Compress & Whse. Co., 194 Ark. 199, 106 S.W.2d 209 (1937) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1309.

2-17-218. Insurance required.

(1)(A)At all times, every public grain warehouseman shall keep the grain stored in the public grain warehouse insured by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state.

The grain is to be insured for its full market value against loss by fire, inherent explosion, lightning, and windstorm, and failure to do so shall make the public grain warehouseman liable for the grain.

All policies shall provide that no cancellation shall be effective unless thirty (30) days' prior notice is given the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner.

If fire, inherent explosion, lightning, or windstorm shall destroy or damage all or part of the grain stored in any public grain warehouse, the public grain warehouseman shall, upon demand by the holder of any warehouse receipt for the grain and upon being presented with the warehouse receipt, make settlement for the fair market value at the time of the loss after deducting the warehouse charges.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1320.

2-17-219. Receipt of tendered grain.

(1)Every public grain warehouseman shall receive for storage or shipment, so far as the available capacity for storage of the public grain warehouse shall permit, all grain tendered to him or her in the usual course of business.

However, a public grain warehouse owned and operated as a cooperative may decline to accept grain tendered by a nonmember if the cooperative reasonably believes that its available capacity will be required to serve the members of the cooperative.

(1)The depositor and the public grain warehouseman may agree upon a sample taken from the lot of grain to be offered for storage as being a true and representative sample.

The depositor and the public grain warehouseman may agree upon the grade of the grain offered for storage, and a warehouse receipt may be issued on the agreed grade.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1317.

2-17-220. Receipts and records.

(1)Receipts must be issued for all grain stored in a warehouse in accordance with rules adopted under this subchapter.

Receipts need not be issued against nonstorage grain, but each warehouseman shall keep accurate records of the weights, kinds, and grades, if graded, of all lots of nonstorage grain received into and delivered from his or her warehouse.

Whenever the purpose for which any lot of nonstorage grain was received into a warehouse is changed so that its approximate delivery period from the warehouse becomes indeterminate, receipts shall be issued to cover the grain.

Records required under this section with respect to nonstorage grain shall be retained, as a part of the records of the warehouse, for a period of one (1) year after December 31 of the year in which the lot of nonstorage grain is delivered from the warehouse.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 25; 1983, No. 264, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1325.

2-17-221. Contents of receipts.

Every receipt issued for grain stored in a public grain warehouse shall conform to the requirements of §4-7-202 and in addition shall embody within its written or printed terms:

(1)Every receipt, whether negotiable or nonnegotiable, issued for grain stored in a warehouse shall specify a period, not exceeding one (1) year, for which the grain is accepted for storage under this subchapter.

The warehouseman shall, in the absence of some lawful excuse, issue a new receipt for a further specified period not to exceed one (1) year, provided that the following conditions are met:

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1326.

2-17-222. Preparation of forms for warehouse receipts.

The Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner shall prescribe the form of all warehouse receipts, and no other character or form of warehouse receipt shall be issued except those so authorized.

The commissioner shall be authorized to have printed all warehouse receipts issued by public grain warehousemen.

The cost of printing and distribution of warehouse receipts shall be charged to the grain warehouse.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1327.

2-17-223. Numbering of receipts.

All warehouse receipts issued by a public grain warehouse shall be numbered consecutively. No two (2) receipts bearing the same number shall be issued from the same warehouse during any one (1) year, except in the case of a lost or destroyed receipt.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 28; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1328.

2-17-224. Copy of receipts.

At least one (1) copy of all receipts shall be made. All copies shall have clearly and conspicuously printed or stamped on them the words “COPY — NOT NEGOTIABLE”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 29; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1329.

2-17-225. Accuracy of receipts.

No warehouse receipt shall be issued except upon actual delivery of grain into storage in the warehouse from which it purports to be issued, nor shall any receipt be issued for a greater quantity of grain than was contained in the lot or parcel received for storage, nor shall more than one (1) receipt be issued for the same lot of grain, except in cases where a receipt for a part of a lot is desired, and then the aggregate receipts for a particular lot shall cover that lot and no more.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 30; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1330.

2-17-226. Duty of warehouseman to deliver grain.

It shall be the duty of the public grain warehouseman to deliver grain to the holder of a warehouse receipt within ten (10) days of the demand for the redemption of the receipt if no lawful excuse for not delivering the grain exists.

In the event the public grain warehouseman fails to deliver grain to the holder of a warehouse receipt within ten (10) days of the demand, the holder of the warehouse receipt may make demand of the surety for payment under the bond.

The surety has the responsibility to pay within fifteen (15) days following receipt by the surety of the notice of the demand for redemption.

Any holder of a warehouse receipt issued by a public grain warehouseman who had made demand for redemption of the receipt, which demand was, without lawful excuse, not satisfied within ten (10) days, shall notify the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner in writing. The holder of the receipt shall have the right to bring action against the public grain warehouseman and the surety on the public grain warehouseman's bond for payment of the market value of the grain represented by the warehouse receipt. The market value shall be determined as of the date of the demand, plus legal interest accrued from the date of the demand.

In the event the public grain warehouseman is a self-insurer as provided in § 2-17-209, the holder of a warehouse receipt shall have the right to bring action against the public grain warehouseman to the extent of the amount posted in lieu of the bond.

The commissioner shall pay to the holder of the warehouse receipt, to the extent of the bond posted, any judgment obtained by the holder of a warehouse receipt against a self-insurer.

The commissioner may also pay to the holder of a warehouse receipt the amount of the market value of the grain if the public grain warehouseman agrees to the payment.

The license of the public grain warehouseman shall be suspended upon the payment until such time as the warehouseman posts a bond under this subchapter or posts with the commissioner a sum equivalent to that paid by the commissioner on behalf of the warehouseman.

In all actions in which judgment is rendered against any surety company under the provisions of this section, if it appears from evidence that the surety company has willfully and without just cause refused to pay the loss upon demand, the court, in rendering judgment, shall allow the plaintiff the amount of the plaintiff's expenses, including court costs and attorney's fees, to be recovered and collected as part of the costs.

The amount of any payment of costs and attorney's fees under this subsection will not reduce the surety's liability on its bond.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 31; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1331.

2-17-227. Partial delivery.

If a warehouseman delivers only a part of a lot of grain for which he or she has issued a negotiable receipt under this subchapter, he or she shall take up and cancel the receipt and issue a new receipt in accordance with the rules in this subchapter for the undelivered portion of the grain. The new receipt shall show the date of issuance and also indicate the number and date of the receipt first issued.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 32; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1332.

2-17-228. Return of receipt.

Except as permitted by law or by the rules in this subchapter, a warehouseman shall not deliver grain for which he or she has issued a negotiable receipt until the receipt has been returned to him or her and cancelled. He or she shall not deliver grain for which he or she has issued a nonnegotiable receipt until the receipt has been returned to him or her or until he or she has obtained a written order for the receipt from the person lawfully entitled to the delivery or his or her authorized agent.

Before delivery is made of the last portion of a lot of grain covered by a nonnegotiable receipt, the receipt itself shall be surrendered.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 33; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1333.

2-17-229. Verification of signature.

Each person to whom a nonnegotiable receipt is issued shall furnish the warehouseman with a statement in writing, indicating the person having power to authorize delivery of grain covered by the receipt, together with the bona fide signature of the person.

No licensed warehouseman shall honor an order for the release of grain covered by a nonnegotiable receipt until he or she has first ascertained that the person issuing the order has authority to order the release and that the signature of the releasing party is genuine.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 34; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1334.

2-17-230. Sale or pledge of receipts.

A public grain warehouseman may make a valid sale or pledge of any warehouse receipts issued for grain of which the warehouseman is the owner, either solely or jointly in common with others. The recital of ownership in the receipt shall constitute notice of the right to sell or pledge the grains and of the title of specific lien of the transferee or pledgee upon the warehouseman's grain represented by the receipts.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 35; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1335.

2-17-231. Accepting grain for shipment.

If grain is offered for storage in any licensed public grain warehouse and the public grain warehouseman does not have storage space to handle the grain, the public grain warehouseman, with the written consent of the owner, may accept grain for shipment to another public grain warehouse where storage is available.

The receipt to cover grain to be transported to and stored in another public grain warehouse shall embody within its written or printed terms, in addition to the requirements of § 2-17-221, the name and location of the public grain warehouse to which the grain will be shipped for storage.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 36; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1336.

2-17-232. Grain inspector.

During all regular business hours, each public grain warehouse shall employ a grain inspector, who may be the public grain warehouseman himself or herself if the public grain warehouseman is a natural person. He or she shall inspect and weigh all grain received by the warehouse and shall be responsible for the accuracy of weights noted on all warehouse receipts.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1318.

2-17-233. Duty to maintain quality of grain.

It shall be the public grain warehouseman's duty and obligation to condition and maintain the quantity and quality of all grain as receipted.

If the condition of any grain offered for storage is such that it probably will adversely affect the condition of grain in the public grain warehouse, the public grain warehouseman shall not receive the grain for storage or store the grain.

If the public grain warehouse has separate bins or is equipped with proper conditioning apparatus, the public grain warehouseman may receive the grain for storage in separate bins or may condition it and then store it in a manner which will not lower the grade of other grain.

The cost of the examination shall be included in the annual license fee.

(A)The Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner, at his or her discretion, may make additional examinations of any public grain warehouse at any time.

If any material discrepancy is found as a result of additional examination, the cost of the examination is to be paid by the public grain warehouseman.

Upon application for license renewal, every public grain warehouse shall submit a copy of its financial statement to the commissioner. The financial statement shall have been prepared by a certified public accountant and sworn to by the certified public accountant and the public grain warehouseman.

The commissioner may, at his or her discretion, inspect the public grain warehouse's business, facilities, equipment, inventories, property, books, records, accounts, papers, minutes of proceedings held at the public grain warehouse, and any other records which the commissioner deems relevant to the operation of the public grain warehouse.

All scales used for the weighing of property in public grain warehouses shall be subject to tests during regular business hours by the Arkansas Bureau of Standards of the State Plant Board.

All records, reports, and findings of the commissioner required or issued under this subchapter may be released to any interested person and shall be made available to public inspection.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1993, Nos. 610 and 624, § 1, provided:

“The Arkansas Bureau of Standards, created by Act 482 of 1963, as amended, the same being A.C.A.4-18-201 et seq., and its functions, powers, duties, assets, properties, and appropriations are transferred by a type 2 transfer [see §25-2-105] to the State Plant Board.”

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1319.

2-17-234. Records to be maintained.

Every public grain warehouseman shall keep, in a place of safety, complete, separate, and correct records and accounts pertaining to the public grain warehouse. These shall include, but not be limited to, records and accounts of all grain received and withdrawn, all unissued receipts and tickets in its possession, copies of all receipts and tickets issued by it, and the receipts and tickets returned to and cancelled by it.

The records shall be retained by the public grain warehouseman for a period of five (5) years.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1321.

2-17-235. Examinations and inspections.

(1)(A)Every public grain warehouse shall be examined by the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner, each year.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1322.

2-17-236. Insolvent warehouses.

If it shall be discovered that any public grain warehouse is insolvent or that its continuance in business will seriously jeopardize the interest of its creditors or grain depositors, it shall be the duty of the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner to close the warehouse, to take charge of all the property and effects thereof, and to notify the surety.

Upon taking charge of any warehouse, the commissioner shall, as soon as practicable, ascertain by a thorough examination into its affairs its actual financial condition. Whenever the commissioner shall become satisfied that the corporation cannot resume business or liquidate its indebtedness to the satisfaction of its creditors, the commissioner shall report the fact of its insolvency to the Attorney General. Immediately upon receipt of the notice, the Attorney General shall institute proper proceedings in the proper court for the purpose of having a receiver appointed.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1323.